Utah statutes.
32B-2-604.   Bond related to package agency.

(1) (a)  A package agent who has a consignment liquor inventory owned by the state shall post a consignment surety bond payable to the department in the amount of the consignment inventory.

(b)  A consignment surety bond shall be conditioned upon a package agent's return of the unsold consignment liquor inventory at the termination of a package agency agreement.

(2) (a)  A package agent that owns the package agency's liquor inventory shall post a cash bond or surety bond:

(i)  in the penal amount fixed by the department, except that the penal amount shall be at least $1,000; and

(ii)  payable to the department.

(3)  A package agent shall procure and maintain the bond required under this section for as long as the package agent continues to operate as a package agent.

(4)  A bond required under this section shall be:

(a)  in a form approved by the attorney general; and

(b)  conditioned upon the package agent's faithful compliance with this title, the rules of the commission, and the package agency agreement.

(5) (a)  If a surety bond posted by a package agency under this section is canceled due to the package agent's or package agency's negligence, the department may assess a $300 reinstatement fee.

(b)  No part of a bond posted by a package agent under this section may be withdrawn:

(i)  during the period the package agency is in effect; or

(ii)  while a revocation of the package agency is pending against the package agent.

(6) (a)  A bond posted under this section by a package agent may be forfeited if the package agency is revoked.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (6)(a), the department may make a claim against a bond posted by a package agent for money owed the department under this title without the commission first revoking the package agency.



Amended by Chapter 307, 2011 General Session

